Utah statutes.
17D-1-306.   Administrative control board review of certain charges in
special service districts providing jail service.
If the legislative body of a county of the first class creates an
administrative control board under this part for a special service district
that provides jail service as provided in Subsection 17D-1-201(10), the
administrative control board may review and approve any amount charged to the
special service district as reimbursement to the county for services provided
under Subsection 17D-1-103(2)(i) before the amount is included in the special
service district budget.
